Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3
ROUTE DESIGNATION FOR HAZARDOUS MATERIALS

42-20-300.3. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Route designation" means a designation of a route by the state patrol under this part 3.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1176), ch. 56, p. 149, § 1, effective August 10.

42-20-301. Route designation.

The patrol, after consultation with local governmental authorities, has the sole authority to designate which public roads are to be used and which are not to be used by motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials. The patrol shall exercise its authority in accordance with section 42-20-302. Gasoline, diesel fuel, and liquefied petroleum gas are exempt from route designation unless the petitioning authority specified in section 42-20-302 requests their inclusion. The patrol may exempt crude oil from route designation after a request from the petitioning authority.

The patrol may include, as part of designated route restrictions, the closing of streets and highways and other conditions or restrictions the patrol deems advisable, except for hours of operation and curfews.

Routes designated by the patrol in accordance with this part 3 do not apply to motor vehicles when used to transport to or from the farm or ranch site products necessary for agricultural production.

No city, county, or city and county may impose restrictions on hours of operation on designated routes; except that this paragraph (d) does not apply to any city, county, or city and county that, by resolution or ordinance, had routes or hours of operation restrictions in effect on July 1, 1985.

The patrol may approve route designations only for those materials listed in table 1 of 49 CFR 172.504, in any quantities, and those materials listed in table 2 of 49 CFR 172.504, when carried in quantities of five hundred gallons or more; except that the patrol may not accept or approve route designations for those materials listed in table 2 when packaged in containers of five gallons or less or when packaged as consumer commodities as defined in 49 CFR 173.1200.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 3 or part 1 or 2 of this article to the contrary, the transportation commission may regulate hours of operation of the Eisenhower-Johnson tunnels, structure numbers F13Y and F13X, respectively, on interstate 70.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2525, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 963, § 26, effective May 25.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 45, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1176), ch. 56, p. 149, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-301 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-302. Application for route designation - procedure - approval.

Petitions for new route designations or for a change in an existing route designation may be submitted to the patrol no more than once a year:

By a county, with respect to any public road maintained by the county, upon approval of the petition by the board of county commissioners of such county;

By a town, city, or city and county, with respect to any public road located within such town, city, or city and county, including any portion of a county primary road designated pursuant to section 43-2-110 (1.5), C.R.S., that is subsequently annexed by a town or city, upon approval of the petition by the governing body of such town, city, or city and county;

By the department of transportation, with respect to any public road maintained by the state, except for any public road located within a town, city, or city and county, upon approval of the petition by the transportation commission;

By a public highway authority created pursuant to part 5 of article 4 of title 43 with respect to any public highway, as defined in section 43-4-503 (12), that it maintains, either directly or indirectly through a concession agreement or other agreement with a third party, upon approval of the petition by the board of directors of the public highway authority; or

By any governmental entity that is a partner in a public-private partnership with respect to any highway, road, or street that it maintains, either directly or indirectly through a concession agreement or other agreement with a private partner, upon approval by the governing body of the governmental entity.

A county, town, city, or city and county, with approval of the patrol, may adopt and enforce regulations or ordinances concerning the parking of motor vehicles, if such regulations and ordinances, as enforced or applied, do not prohibit or exclude motor vehicles carrying hazardous materials from the enforcing jurisdiction and do not unreasonably limit parking on or near the designated routes through the enforcing jurisdiction or for pickup and delivery.

The petition shall describe specifically the designation sought, shall identify any local business or industry which is known to be significantly reliant on hazardous materials transportation and which would be affected by the designation, and shall include any other information which is necessary for the patrol to act upon the petition and which is required by rule and regulation of the patrol.

Upon the filing of a complete petition with the patrol, the patrol shall give adequate public notice of such petition, including at least the following:

Notification by certified mail to the governing body of any county, town, city, or city and county which would be affected by the route designation; and

Publication in a newspaper having general circulation in each affected community once each week for three consecutive weeks.

If the petitioner is not the department of transportation, the patrol shall provide a copy of the petition to the department of transportation for its review and comment.

No sooner than thirty days after the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section have been met and after reasonable notice to the petitioner, to the department of transportation, and to any persons requesting such notice, the patrol shall hold an informal public conference on the petition. At such conference, representatives of the petitioner and the department of transportation and any interested persons shall be afforded the opportunity to comment on the petition, and the petitioner shall have the opportunity to amend the petition. The patrol shall approve the designation if there is no opposition to the petition and if the requirements of subsection (8) of this section have been met.

If there is opposition to the petition at the informal public conference and no agreement can be reached, the patrol shall hold a formal public hearing and act on the petition in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

No route designation shall be approved by the patrol unless it finds that:

The routes available for the transportation of hazardous materials by motor vehicle:

Are feasible, practicable, and not unreasonably expensive for such transportation;

Are continuous within a jurisdiction and from one jurisdiction to another;

Provide greater safety to the public than other feasible routes; and

Do not unreasonably burden interstate or intrastate commerce;

The designation is not arbitrary or intended by the petitioner merely to divert the transportation of hazardous materials to other communities;

Reasonable provision is made for signs along the affected public roads giving adequate notice of the designation to the public, to affected industry, and to transporters of hazardous materials. Such signs shall not be required in jurisdictions where the governmental authority has provided the patrol with professional quality maps which indicate the route designations in that jurisdiction.

The designation will not interfere with the pickup or delivery of hazardous materials; and

The designation is consistent with all applicable federal laws and regulations.

Any town, city, city and county, or county may request the department of transportation to submit a petition to the patrol for a route designation on any highway maintained by the state within the jurisdiction of said local entity.

The patrol shall make a final decision to approve or deny any petition for a route designation within six months of the filing of the petition.

The patrol shall base the approval or denial of a petition to exempt crude oil upon due consideration of the factors listed in subsection (8) of this section.

The patrol shall approve route designations for gasoline, diesel fuel, and liquefied petroleum gas requested by petitioning authorities under section 42-20-301 (1) where the designations follow routes approved by the patrol for other hazardous materials under this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2525, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2011:

(11) amended, (HB 11-1176), ch. 56, p. 150, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2016:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 16-1155), ch. 134, p. 386, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) added, (SB 19-032), ch. 81, p. 290, § 1, effective April 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-302 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-303. Road signs required - uniform standards.

Signs giving adequate notice of route designations shall be placed and maintained along public roads affected by such designations. In accordance with part 6 of article 4 of this title and section 42-4-105, the department of transportation shall adopt uniform standards for highway signs giving notice of route designations. The requirements of this section shall not apply to jurisdictions in which the governmental authority has provided the patrol with professional quality maps which indicate the route designations in that jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2527, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-303 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-304. Emergency closure of public roads.

Nothing in part 1, 2, or 3 of this article shall limit the authority of state and local authorities to close public roads temporarily if necessary because of any road construction or maintenance, an accident, a natural disaster, the weather conditions, or any other emergency circumstances resulting in making road conditions unsafe for travel by motor vehicles transporting hazardous materials.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2528, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-304 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-305. Deviation from authorized route - penalty.

No person shall transport hazardous materials by motor vehicle contrary to any route designation approved by the patrol pursuant to this part 3 unless such action is necessary to service a motor vehicle or to make a local pickup or delivery of hazardous materials or unless such action is so required by emergency conditions which would make continued use of authorized routes unsafe or by the closure of an authorized route pursuant to section 42-20-304, and, in such circumstances, the motor vehicle shall remain on authorized routes whenever possible and shall minimize the distance traveled on restricted routes. A person transporting hazardous materials by motor vehicle may make successive local pickups and deliveries without returning to the authorized route between each pickup or delivery when such return would be unreasonable. A person transporting hazardous materials shall not utilize residential streets unless there is no other reasonable route available to reach the destination.

Any person who transports hazardous materials by motor vehicle in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section commits a misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be assessed a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for each separate violation in accordance with the procedure set forth in section 42-20-105 (2). A person who commits a second or subsequent violation within a twelve-month period of transporting hazardous materials by motor vehicle in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section commits a misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be issued a summons and complaint in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-1707 (1), and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars.

All penalties collected pursuant to this section by a state agency or by a court shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the hazardous materials safety fund created in section 42-20-107.

Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under subsection (2) of this section shall forward to the chief a record of the conviction of any person in said court for a violation of any said laws within forty-eight hours after such conviction. The term "conviction" means a final conviction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2528, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-305 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-306. Transportation of hazardous materials through Eisenhower-Edwin C Johnson Memorial Tunnels - study - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of transportation created in section 43-1-103.

"Tunnel" means the Eisenhower-Edwin C. Johnson Memorial Tunnels.

The department shall conduct a study to assess the feasibility of allowing the transportation of hazardous materials through the tunnel and shall prepare a study report that includes findings and recommendations as to whether and under what conditions the transportation of hazardous materials through the tunnel should be allowed. The department shall complete the study and study report no later than December 1, 2020, and shall provide copies of the report to the members of the transportation commission, the Colorado state patrol, the prime sponsors of Senate Bill 19-032, enacted in 2019, and the representatives of the entities listed in subsection (3) of this section.

In determining the scope of the study, the department shall solicit input from representatives of:

Summit county;

Clear Creek county;

The towns of Dillon, Georgetown, Silver Plume, and Silverthorne and the residents of the unincorporated community of Keystone;

Summit fire & EMS;

Clear Creek fire authority;

Club 20, which representative or representatives shall not reside in Summit county;

The department of public safety, including representatives of the division of fire prevention and control and the Colorado state patrol;

Distributors and sellers of fuel;

Motor carriers that transport fuel; and

The Colorado ski industry, including representatives of the Keystone, Loveland, and Arapahoe Basin ski resorts and the trade association representing Colorado's ski industry.

In conducting the study and preparing the study report, the department shall, at a minimum:

Consider all of the "Factors to Address When Considering Route Changes" that are listed in the department's "Procedural Directive No. 1903.1 - Hazardous Materials Routing Procedure", dated February 3, 2011;

Avoid duplication of effort by taking into account past studies and recommendations including, at a minimum:

The final report titled "Fire Emergency Preparedness at the Eisenhower-Johnson Memorial Tunnels, CO", dated February 24, 2017, that the Colorado school of mines prepared for the department and that the department has labeled as "Report No. CDOT-2017-06"; and

The final report titled "Risk Analysis Study of Hazardous Materials Trucks through Eisenhower/Johnson Memorial Tunnels", dated June 2006, that Parsons Brinckerhoff Quade and Douglas prepared for the department;

Analyze the different levels and types of risk to public safety of multiple options that allow the transportation of hazardous materials through the tunnel on a limited basis in lieu of allowing transportation of all hazardous materials through the tunnel at all times, which must include, at a minimum, analysis of:

Eastbound versus westbound transportation of hazardous materials through the tunnel;

Limitations on the days or times during which transportation of hazardous materials through the tunnel is allowed;

Whether the transportation of gasoline, diesel, and liquefied petroleum gas through the tunnel should be subject to different requirements than the transportation of other hazardous materials through the tunnel; and

Consider the impact that potential improvements to the interstate highway 70 mountain corridor between mile markers 204 and 223 and the U.S. highway 6 corridor on and adjacent to Loveland pass through the unincorporated community of Keystone and the towns of Dillon and Silverthorne might have on the safety and environmental risks of transporting hazardous materials over those highways and the costs of making or not making such improvements.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2021.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-032), ch. 81, p. 290, § 2, effective April 8.